Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-601
Jurisdiction of courts; duty of prosecuting attorneys.

All prosecutions for violations of the Game Law shall be brought in the name of the State of Nebraska before any court having jurisdiction thereof. It shall be the duty of all prosecuting attorneys in their respective jurisdictions to prosecute all persons charged with violations of the Game Law.

Laws 1929, c. 112, VI, § 1, p. 433;

C.S.1929, § 37-601;

R.S.1943, § 37-601;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 228;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-601;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 291;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 84.